Hawaii statutes.
[§488-8] Access to records. (a)
Every plan and its owners, operators, officers, employees, and representatives
shall:

(1) Be subject to investigation or examination by the
commissioner;

(2) Produce and make freely accessible to the
commissioner all accounts, records, documents, and files in the person's
possession or control relating to the subject of the investigation or
examination; and

(3) Cooperate with any investigation or examination
by the commissioner.

(b) If the commissioner finds the accounts or
records of a plan, or of its owners, operators, officers, employees, or
representatives, to be inadequate, improperly kept, or improperly posted, and
if the plan has failed to correct the accounts or records after the
commissioner has given the plan written notice and a reasonable opportunity to
do so, the commissioner may employ experts to rewrite, post, or balance the
accounts at the expense of the plan being examined.

(c) A plan administrator shall provide a
written response within seven days to any written inquiry made by the
commissioner. The response shall be more than an acknowledgment that the
commissioner's communication was received and shall adequately address the
concerns stated in the communication. [L 2011, c 186, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next